Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.120

Civil actions by attorney general—Attorneys' fees—Criminal actions not limited by chapter.

(1) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful. The prevailing party may in the discretion of the court recover the costs of such action including a reasonable attorneys' fee.

(2) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime by statute or at common law.

[ 1986 c 320 s 13.]